Georgia, session 2025_26, HB810.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 64 of Title 33 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to regulation and
licensure of pharmacy benefits managers, is amended by adding a new Code section to read
as follows:
"33-64-9.2.
(a) A pharmacy benefits manager shall ensure that the final reimbursement to a pharmacy
for a prescription drug is an amount no less than the national average drug acquisition cost
for the prescription drug at the time that such drug was dispensed, plus a professional
dispensing fee of $10.64. If the national average drug acquisition cost at the time such
H. B. 810
- 1 -

LC 46 1212
drug was dispensed is not available, a pharmacy benefits manager shall not reimburse a
pharmacy in an amount that is less than the wholesale acquisition cost of the drug, as
defined in 42 U.S.C. Section 1395w-3a(c)(6)(B), on January 1, 2025, plus a professional
dispensing fee of $10.64. The minimum professional dispensing fee set forth in this
subsection shall automatically adjust every 12 months in an amount equal to the average
percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for medical care for all urban consumers
over the immediately prior 12 month period or as may be determined appropriate by the
Commissioner, provided that any adjustment by the Commissioner shall not result in a
professional dispensing fee less than the current Georgia Medicaid professional dispensing
fee as determined by the Department of Community Health. A pharmacy benefits manager
shall exclude any reimbursement made pursuant to this paragraph from any effective rate
guarantees. As used in this subsection, the term 'effective rate guarantees' means a
contractual provision whereby a pharmacy benefits manager may adjust reimbursement
rates to pharmacies for prescription drugs dispensed by the pharmacy during a certain
period of time, ensuring that the pharmacy's overall reimbursement averages out to be a
predetermined rate.
(b) Any reimbursement made by a pharmacy benefits manager to a pharmacy at or above
the amount set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section shall not be subject to
subsection (a) of Code Section 33-64-9 and Code Section 33-64-9.1.
(c) A pharmacy benefits manager shall not offer reimbursement or incentives to a
nonaffiliated pharmacy in an amount less than that offered to an affiliated pharmacy for
providing the same prescription drug except, and only to the extent, otherwise required by
law.
(d) This Code section shall not apply to the state employees' health insurance plan
established pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 18 of Title 45; the health insurance plan for
public school teachers and the health insurance plan for public school employees
established pursuant to Subparts 2 and 3, respectively, of Part 6 of Article 17 of Chapter
H. B. 810
- 2 -

LC 46 1212
2 of Title 20; and the health benefit plan established for members, employees, and retirees
of the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia pursuant to Code Section
31-2-4. This Code section shall also not apply to Medicaid under Chapter 4 of Title 49
when the Department of Community Health reimburses providers directly for each covered
service; provided, however, that this Code section shall apply to Medicaid care
management programs administered through care management organizations."
SECTION 2.
Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 49 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
medical assistance generally, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"49-4-159.5.
(a) The department shall ensure that all contracts that it enters into with care management
organizations involving the provision of prescription drugs are in compliance with Code
Section 33-64-9.2.
(b) To implement the provisions of this Code section, the department shall, when
necessary, submit a Medicaid state plan amendment or waiver request to the United States
Department of Health and Human Services."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective July 1, 2025, and shall apply to all applicable policies,
contracts, and certificates executed, delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state
on or after October 1, 2025.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 810
- 3 -